Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-522
Audiology or speech-language pathology assistant; aural rehabilitation programs; training.

In addition to the initial training required by section 38-521, an audiology or speech-language pathology assistant assigned to provide aural rehabilitation programs shall have additional training which shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Information concerning the nature of hearing loss;

(2) Purposes and principles of auditory and visual training;

(3) Maintenance and use of amplification devices; and

(4) Such other subjects as the department may deem appropriate.

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 27;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 73;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,195.05;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 33;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 207.